California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) (A) Mental health and substance use disorder treatment services,
 evidence-based practices and community-defined evidence practices for similar to those provided under other programs that are effective in preventing mental health illnesses and substance use disorders from becoming severe, and components similar to programs that have been successful in reducing the duration of untreated serious mental health illnesses and substance use disorders and assisting people in quickly regaining productive lives.

(B) Mental health treatment services may include services to address first episode psychosis.

(C) Mental health and substance use disorder services shall include services that are demonstrated to be effective at meeting the cultural and linguistic needs of diverse communities.

(D) Mental health and substance use disorder services may be provided to the following eligible children
 and youth:

(i) Individual children and youth at high risk for a behavioral health disorder due to experiencing trauma, as evidenced by scoring in the high-risk range under a trauma screening tool such as an adverse childhood experiences (ACEs) screening tool, involvement in the child welfare system or juvenile justice system, or experiencing homelessness.

(ii) Individual children and youth in populations with identified disparities in behavioral health outcomes.

(E) Mental health and substance use services may include services that prevent, respond to, or treat a behavioral health crisis.

(4) Additional components developed by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(c) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, counties, and stakeholders, shall establish a biennial list of evidence-based practices and community-defined evidence practices that may include practices identified pursuant to the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative Act set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5961) of Part 7.

(2) Evidence-based practices and community-defined evidence practices may focus on addressing the needs of those who decompensate into severe behavioral health conditions.

(3) Local programs utilizing evidence-based practices and community-defined evidence practices may focus on addressing the needs of underserved communities, such as BIPOC and LGBTQ+.

(4) Counties
 shall utilize the list to determine which evidence-based practices and community-defined evidence practices to implement locally.

(5) The State Department of Health Care Services may require a county to implement specific evidence-based and community-defined evidence practices.

(d) The early intervention program shall emphasize the reduction of the likelihood of:

(1) Suicide and self-harm.

(2) Incarcerations.

(3) School, including early childhood 0 to 5 years of age, inclusive, TK-12, and higher education, suspension, expulsion, referral to an alternative or community school, or failure to complete.

(4) Unemployment.

(5) Prolonged suffering.

(6) Homelessness.

(7) Removal of children from their homes.

(8) Overdose.

(9) Mental illness in children and youth from social, emotional, developmental, and behavioral needs in early childhood.

(e) For purposes of this section, “substance use disorder” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(f) For purposes of this section, “community-defined evidence practices” is defined as an alternative or complement to evidence-based practices, that offers culturally anchored interventions that reflect the values,
 practices, histories, and lived-experiences of the communities they serve. These practices come from the community and the organizations that serve them and are found to yield positive results as determined by community consensus over time.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 50) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 39.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5840.2.

The department shall contract for the provision of services pursuant to this part with each county mental health program in the manner set forth in Section 5897.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 583.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Prevention and Early Intervention Program Planning [5840.6. - 5840.7.]

5840.6.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Commission” means the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission established pursuant to Section 5845.

(b) “County” also includes a city receiving funds pursuant to Section 5701.5.

(c) “Prevention and early intervention funds” means funds from the Behavioral Health Services Fund allocated for prevention and early intervention programs pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892.

(d) “Childhood trauma prevention and early intervention” refers to a program that targets children
 exposed to, or who are at risk of exposure to, adverse and traumatic childhood events and prolonged toxic stress in order to deal with the early origins of mental health needs and prevent long-term mental health concerns. This may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Focused outreach and early intervention to at-risk and in-need populations.

(2) Implementation of appropriate trauma and developmental screening and assessment tools with linkages to early intervention services to children that qualify for these services.

(3) Collaborative, strengths-based approaches that appreciate the resilience of trauma survivors and support their parents and caregivers when appropriate.

(4) Support from peer support specialists and community health
 workers trained to provide mental health services.

(5) Multigenerational family engagement, education, and support for navigation and service referrals across systems that aid the healthy development of children and families.

(6) Linkages to primary care health settings, including, but not limited to, federally qualified health centers, rural health centers, community-based providers, school-based health centers, and school-based programs.

(7) Leveraging the healing value of traditional cultural connections, including policies, protocols, and processes that are responsive to the racial, ethnic, and cultural needs of individuals served and recognition of historical trauma.

(8) Coordinated and blended funding streams to ensure individuals and families
 experiencing toxic stress have comprehensive and integrated supports across systems.

(e) “Early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5835 and may include programming across the age span.

(f) “Youth outreach and engagement” means strategies that target secondary school and transition age youth, with a priority on partnerships with college mental health programs that educate and engage students and provide either on-campus, off-campus, or linkages to mental health services not provided through the campus to students who are attending colleges and universities, including, but not limited to, public community colleges. Outreach and engagement may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Meeting the mental
 health needs of students that cannot be met through existing education funds.

(2) Establishing direct linkages for students to community-based mental health services.

(3) Addressing direct services, including, but not limited to, increasing college mental health staff-to-student ratios and decreasing wait times.

(4) Participating in evidence-based and community-defined best practice programs for mental health services.

(5) Serving underserved and vulnerable populations, including, but not limited to, lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer persons, victims of domestic violence and sexual abuse, and veterans.

(6) Establishing direct linkages for students to community-based mental
 health services for which reimbursement is available through the students’ health coverage.

(7) Reducing racial disparities in access to mental health services.

(8) Funding mental health stigma reduction training and activities.

(9) Providing college employees and students with education and training in early identification, intervention, and referral of students with mental health needs.

(10) Interventions for youth with signs of behavioral or emotional problems who are at risk of, or have had any, contact with the juvenile justice system.

(11) Integrated youth mental health programming.

(12) Suicide prevention
 programming.

(g) “Culturally competent and linguistically appropriate prevention and intervention” refers to a program that creates critical linkages with community-based organizations, including, but not limited to, clinics licensed or operated under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, or clinics exempt from clinic licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(1) “Culturally competent and linguistically appropriate” means the ability to reach underserved cultural populations and address specific barriers related to racial, ethnic, cultural, language, gender, age, economic, or other disparities in mental health services access, quality, and outcomes.

(2) “Underserved cultural populations” means those who are unlikely to seek help from any traditional
 mental health service because of stigma, lack of knowledge, or other barriers, including members of ethnically and racially diverse communities, members of the gay, lesbian, bisexual, and transgender communities, and veterans, across their lifespans.

(h) “Strategies targeting the mental health needs of older adults” means, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Outreach and engagement strategies that target caregivers, victims of elder abuse, and individuals who live alone.

(2) Suicide prevention programming.

(3) Outreach to older adults who are isolated.

(4) Early identification programming of mental health symptoms and disorders, including, but not limited to, anxiety,
 depression, and psychosis.

(i) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 40) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 16.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 53 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.    Note: Amended in Prop. 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5840.6.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “County” includes a city receiving funds pursuant to Section 5701.5.

(b) “Early intervention funds” means funds from the Behavioral Health Services Fund allocated for early intervention services and programs pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892.

(c) “Childhood trauma early intervention” refers to a program that targets eligible children and youth exposed to, or who are at risk of exposure to, adverse and traumatic childhood events
 and prolonged toxic stress in order to deal with the early origins of mental health and substance use disorder needs and prevent long-term mental health and substance use disorder concerns. This may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Focused outreach and early intervention to at-risk and in-need populations, including youth experiencing homelessness, justice-involved youth, LGBTQ+ youth, and child welfare-involved youth.

(2) Implementation of appropriate trauma and developmental screening and assessment tools with linkages to early intervention services to eligible children and youth who qualify for these services.

(3) Collaborative, strengths-based approaches that appreciate the
 resilience of trauma survivors and support their parents and caregivers when appropriate.

(4) Support from peer support specialists, wellness coaches, and community health workers trained to provide mental health and substance use disorder treatment services with an emphasis on culturally and linguistically tailored approaches.

(5) Multigenerational family engagement, education, and support for navigation and service referrals across systems that aid the healthy development of children and youth and their families.

(6) Collaboration with county child welfare agencies and other system partners, including Medi-Cal managed care plans, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, and homeless youth service providers, to
 address the physical and behavioral health-related needs and social needs of child-welfare-involved youth.

(7) Linkages to primary care health settings, including, but not limited to, federally qualified health centers, rural health centers, community-based providers, school-based health centers, school-linked providers, and school-based programs and community-based organizations specializing in serving underserved communities.

(8) Leveraging the healing value of traditional cultural connections and faith-based organizations, including policies, protocols, and processes that are responsive to the racial, ethnic, and cultural needs of individuals served and recognition of historical trauma.

(9) Blended
 funding streams to provide individuals and families experiencing toxic stress comprehensive and integrated supports across systems.

(10) Partnerships with local educational agencies and school-based behavioral health professionals to identify and address children exposed to, or who are at risk of exposure to, adverse and traumatic childhood events and prolonged toxic stress.

(d) “Early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5835 and may include programming across the age span.

(e) “Youth outreach and engagement” means strategies that target out-of-school youth and secondary
 schoolage youth, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Establishing direct linkages for youth to community-based mental health and substance use disorder treatment services.

(2) Participating in evidence-based practices and community-defined evidence programs for mental health and substance use disorder treatment services.

(3) Providing supports to facilitate access to services and programs, including those utilizing community-defined evidence practices, for underserved and vulnerable populations, including, but not limited to, members of ethnically and racially diverse communities, members of the LGBTQ+ communities, victims of domestic violence and sexual abuse,
 and veterans.

(4) Establishing direct linkages for students to community-based mental health and substance use disorder treatment services for which reimbursement is available through the students’ health coverage.

(5) Reducing racial disparities in access to mental health and substance use disorder treatment services.

(6) Providing school employees and students with education
 and training in early identification, intervention, and referral of students with mental health and substance use disorder needs.

(7) Strategies and programs for youth with signs of behavioral or emotional problems or substance misuse who are at risk of, or have had, contact with the child welfare or juvenile justice system.

(8) Integrated youth mental health and substance use disorder programming.

(f) “Culturally competent and linguistically appropriate
 intervention” refers to a program that creates critical linkages with community-based organizations, including, but not limited to, clinics licensed or operated under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code and clinics exempt from clinic licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code. The community-based organizations include facilities and providers licensed or certified by the State Department of Health Care Services, including, but not limited to, residential substance use disorder facilities licensed pursuant to Section 11834.01 of the Health and Safety Code or certified pursuant to Section 11830.1 of the Health and Safety Code and narcotic treatment programs licensed pursuant to Section 11839 of the Health and Safety Code. Community-based organizations
 may also include those organizations that provide community-defined evidence practices. 

(1) “Culturally competent and linguistically appropriate” means the ability to reach underserved cultural populations and address specific barriers related to racial, ethnic, cultural, language, gender, age, economic, or other disparities in mental health and substance use disorder treatment services access, quality, and outcomes.

(2) “Underserved cultural populations” means those who are unlikely to seek help from providers of traditional mental health and substance use disorder services because of stigma, lack of knowledge, or other barriers, including members of ethnically and racially diverse communities, members of the LGBTQ+ communities, victims of domestic violence and sexual
 abuse, and veterans, across their lifespans.

(g) “Strategies targeting the mental health and substance use disorder needs of older adults” means, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Outreach and engagement strategies that target caregivers, victims of elder abuse, and individuals who live alone.

(2) Outreach to older adults who are isolated.

(3) Programs for early identification of mental health disorders and substance use disorders.

(h) “Community-defined evidence practices” is defined as an alternative or complement to evidence-based practices, that offer culturally anchored
 interventions that reflect the values, practices, histories, and lived-experiences of the communities they serve. These practices come from the community and the organizations that serve them and are found to yield positive results as determined by community consensus over time. 

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Service Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 52) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 53.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5840.7.

(a) On or before January 1, 2020, the commission shall establish priorities for the use of prevention and early intervention funds. These priorities shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Childhood trauma prevention and early intervention to deal with the early origins of mental health needs.

(2) Early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention, and mood disorder and suicide prevention programming that occurs across the lifespan.

(3) Youth outreach and engagement strategies that target secondary school and transition age youth,
 with a priority on partnership with college mental health programs.

(4) Culturally competent and linguistically appropriate prevention and intervention.

(5) Strategies targeting the mental health needs of older adults.

(6) Other programs the commission identifies, with stakeholder participation, that are proven effective in achieving, and are reflective of, the goals stated in Section 5840.

(b) On or before January 1, 2020, the commission shall develop a statewide strategy for monitoring implementation of this part, including enhancing public understanding of prevention and early intervention and creating metrics for assessing the effectiveness of how
 prevention and early intervention funds are used and the outcomes that are achieved. The commission shall analyze and monitor the established metrics using existing data, if available, and shall propose new data collection and reporting strategies, if necessary.

(c) The commission shall establish a strategy for technical assistance, support, and evaluation to support the successful implementation of the objectives, metrics, data collection, and reporting strategy.

(d) (1) The portion of funds in the county plan relating to prevention and early intervention shall focus on the established priorities, and shall be allocated, as determined by the county, with stakeholder input. A county may include other priorities, as determined through the stakeholder
 process, either in place of, or in addition to, the established priorities. If the county chooses to include other programs, the plan shall include a description of why those programs are included and metrics by which the effectiveness of those programs is to be measured.

(2) Counties may act jointly to meet the requirements of this section.

(e) If the commission requires additional resources for these purposes, it may prepare a proposal for consideration by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(f) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1,
 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 54.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 55 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5840.7.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, shall establish priorities for the use of early intervention funds. These priorities shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Childhood trauma early intervention to deal with the early origins of mental health and substance use disorder treatment needs, including strategies focused on eligible children and youth experiencing homelessness, justice-involved children and youth, child welfare-involved children and youth with a history of trauma, and other populations at risk of developing a mental health disorder or
 condition as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 14184.402 or substance use disorders. Childhood trauma early intervention services shall not be limited to individuals enrolled in the Medi-Cal program.

(2) Early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention and mood disorder programming that occurs across the lifespan.

(3) Outreach and engagement strategies that target
 early childhood 0 to 5 years of age, inclusive, out-of-school youth, and secondary school youth. Partnerships with community-based organizations and college mental health and substance use disorder programs may be utilized to implement the strategies.

(4) Culturally competent and linguistically appropriate interventions.

(5) Strategies targeting the mental health and substance use disorder needs of older adults.

(6) Strategies targeting the mental health needs of eligible children and youth, as defined in Section 5892, who are 0 to 5 years of age, including, but not limited to, infant and early childhood mental health consultation. 

(7) Strategies to advance equity and reduce disparities.

(8) Programs that include community-defined evidence practices and evidence-based practices and mental health and substance use disorder treatment services similar to those provided under other programs that are effective in preventing mental illness and substance use disorders from becoming severe and components similar to programs that have been successful in reducing the duration of untreated severe mental illness and substance use disorders to assist people in quickly regaining productive lives.

(9) Other programs the State Department of Health Care Services identifies that are proven effective in preventing mental illness and substance use disorders from becoming severe and disabling, consistent with Section
 5840.

(10) Strategies to address the needs of individuals at high risk of crisis.

(b) (1) (A) The portion of funds in the county plan relating to early intervention shall focus on the established priorities and shall be allocated as determined by the county with stakeholder input.

(B) (i) A county may include other priorities, as determined through the stakeholder process, in addition to the established priorities.

(ii) If a county chooses to include other programs, the plan shall include a description of why those programs are included and metrics by which the effectiveness of those programs is to be measured.

(2) Counties may act jointly to meet the requirements of this section.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 54) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 55.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.7. OVERSIGHT AND ACCOUNTABILITY [5845. - 5847.]

5845.

(a) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission is hereby established to promote transformational change in California’s behavioral health system through research, evaluation and tracking outcomes, and other strategies to assess and report progress. The commission shall use this information and analyses to inform the commission’s grant making, identify key policy issues and emerging best practices, provide technical assistance and training, promote high-quality programs implemented, and advise the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to the Behavioral Health Services Act and related components of California’s behavioral health system. For this purpose, the commission shall collaborate with the California Health and Human Services Agency, its departments and other state entities.

(b) (1) The commission shall replace the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 5814.

(2) The commission shall consist of 27 voting members as follows:

(A) The Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee.

(B) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Superintendent’s designee.

(C) The Chairperson of the Senate Committee on Health, the Chairperson of the Senate Committee on Human Services, or another member of the Senate selected by the President pro Tempore of the Senate, or their designee.

(D) The Chairperson of the Assembly Committee on Health, the Chairperson of the Assembly
 Committee on Human Services, or another Member of the Assembly selected by the Speaker of the Assembly, or their designee.

(E) (i) The following individuals, all appointed by the Governor:

(I) Two persons who have or have had a mental health disorder.

(II) Two persons who have or have had a substance use disorder.

(III) A family member of an adult or older adult who has or has had a mental health disorder.

(IV) One person who is 25 years of age or younger and has or has had a mental health disorder, substance use disorder, or cooccurring disorder.

(V) A family member of an adult or older adult who has or
 has had a substance use disorder.

(VI) A family member of a child or youth who has or has had a mental health disorder.

(VII) A family member of a child or youth who has or has had a substance use disorder.

(VIII) A current or former county behavioral health director.

(IX) A physician specializing in substance use disorder treatment, including the provision of medications for addiction treatment.

(X) A mental health professional.

(XI) A professional with expertise in housing and homelessness.

(XII) A county sheriff.

(XIII) A superintendent of a school district.

(XIV) A representative of a labor organization.

(XV) A representative of an employer with less than 500 employees.

(XVI) A representative of an employer with more than 500 employees.

(XVII) A representative of a health care service plan or insurer.

(XVIII) A representative of an aging or disability organization.

(XIX) A person with knowledge and experience in community-defined evidence practices and reducing behavioral health disparities.

(XX) A
 representative of a children and youth organization.

(XXI) A veteran or a representative of a veterans organization.

(ii) In making appointments, the Governor shall seek individuals who have had personal or family experience with mental illness or substance use disorder.

(c) Members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(d) The term of each member shall be three years, to be staggered so that approximately one-third of the appointments expire in each year.

(e) (1) The commission shall have an Executive Director.

(2) The Executive Director will be responsible for management over the administrative, fiscal, and program performance of the commission.

(3) The Executive Director shall be selected by the commission.

(4) The commission may delegate to the Executive Director any power, duty, purpose, function, or jurisdiction that the commission may lawfully delegate, including the authority to enter into and sign contracts on behalf of the commission. The Executive Director may redelegate any of those powers, duties, purposes, functions, or jurisdictions to the Executive Director’s designee, unless by statute, or rule or regulation, the Executive Director is expressly required to act personally.

(f) In carrying out its duties and responsibilities, the commission may do all of the following:

(1) (A) Meet at least once each quarter at a time and location convenient to the public as it may deem appropriate.

(B) All meetings of the commission shall be open to the public.

(2) Within the limit of funds allocated for these purposes, pursuant to the laws and regulations governing state civil service, employ staff, including clerical, legal, and technical assistance, as necessary.

(3) The commission shall administer its operations separate and apart from the State Department of Health Care Services and the California Health and Human Services Agency.

(4) Establish technical advisory committees, such as a committee of consumers and family members, and a reducing
 disparities committee focusing on demographic, geographic, and other communities. The commission may provide pertinent information gained from those committees to relevant state agencies and departments, including, but not limited to, the California Health and Humans Services Agency and its departments.

(5) Employ all other appropriate strategies necessary or convenient to enable it to fully and adequately perform its duties and exercise the powers expressly granted, notwithstanding authority expressly granted to an officer or employee of state government.

(6) Enter into contracts.

(7) Make reasonable requests for data and information to the State Department of Health Care Services, the Department of Health Care Access and Information, the State Department of Public Health, or other state and local entities that
 receive Behavioral Health Services Act funds. These entities shall respond in a timely manner and provide information and data in their possession that the commission deems necessary for the purposes of carrying out its responsibilities.

(8) Participate in the joint state-county decisionmaking process, as described in Section 4061, for training, technical assistance, and regulatory resources to meet the mission and goals of the state’s mental health system.

(9) Identify best practices to overcome stigma and discrimination, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health.

(10) At any time, advise the Governor or the Legislature regarding actions the state may take to improve care and services for people with mental illness or substance use disorder.

(11) If the commission identifies a critical issue related to the performance of a county mental health program, it may refer the issue to the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Section 5655 or 5963.04.

(12) Provide technical assistance to counties on implementation planning, training, and capacity building investments as defined by the State Department of Health Care Services and in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California. Technical assistance may also include innovative behavioral health models of care and innovative promising practices pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892. Technical assistance may also include compiling and publishing a list of innovative behavioral health models of care programs and promising practices for each of the programs set forth in subparagraphs (1), (2),
 and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892.

(13) Work in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services to define the parameters of a report that includes recommendations for improving and standardizing promising practices across the state based on the technical assistance provided to counties as specified in paragraph (12). The commission shall prepare and publish the report on its internet website. In formulating this report, the commission shall prioritize the perspectives of the California behavioral health community through a robust public engagement process with a focus on priority populations and diverse communities.

(14) Establish a framework and voluntary standard for mental health in the workplace that serves to reduce mental health stigma, increase public, employee, and employer awareness of the recovery goals of the Mental Health Services Act, and
 provide guidance to California’s employer community to put in place strategies and programs, as determined by the commission, to support the mental health and wellness of employees. The commission shall consult with the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or its designee to develop the standard.

(g) (1) The commission shall work in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services and the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, and in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, to write a report that includes recommendations for improving and standardizing promising practices for Behavioral Health Services Act programs.

(2) The commission shall complete the report and provide a written report on its internet website no later than January 1, 2030, and every three years thereafter.

(h) For purposes of this section, “substance use disorder” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 58) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 41.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.1.

(a) (1) The Behavioral Health Services Act Innovation Partnership Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(2) The fund shall be administered by the state for the purposes of funding a grant program administered by the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission pursuant to this section and subdivision (f) of Section 5892.

(b) All of the following may be paid into the fund:

(1) Any private donation or grant.

(2) Any other federal or state grant.

(3) Any
 interest that accrues on amounts in the fund and any moneys previously allocated from private donations or grants received by the fund that are subsequently returned to the fund.

(c) (1) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall award grants to private, public, and nonprofit partners to promote development of innovative mental health and substance use disorder programs and practices.

(2) The innovative mental health and substance use disorder programs and practices shall be designed for the following purposes:

(A) Improving Behavioral Health Services Act programs and practices funded pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5892 for the following groups:

(i) Underserved populations.

(ii) Low-income populations.

(iii) Communities impacted by other behavioral health disparities.

(iv) Other populations, as determined by the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission.

(B) Meeting statewide Behavioral Health Services Act goals and objectives.

(3) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, in determining the allowable uses of the funds, shall consult with the California Health and Human Services Agency and the State Department of Health Care Services. If the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission utilizes funding for population-based prevention or workforce innovation grants, the commission shall
 consult with the State Department of Public Health for population-based prevention innovations and the Department of Health Care Access and Information for workforce innovations.

(d) (1) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall submit a report to the Legislature by January 1, 2030, and every three years thereafter. The report shall cover the three-fiscal-year period immediately preceding the date of submission.

(2) The report shall include the practices funded pursuant to this section and the extent to which they accomplished the purposes specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (b).

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 42.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.5.

In addition to the activities authorized under Section 5845, the commission may establish a fellowship program in accordance with this section for the purpose of providing an experiential learning opportunity for mental health or substance use disorder consumers and mental health or substance use disorder professionals.

(a) Participants in the fellowship shall serve on an annual basis and may serve only one term as a fellow.

(b) The fellowship program established under this section shall support the broad goals of the commission and be based upon the following principles:

(1) To enhance opportunities for the work of the commission to reflect the perspective of persons with personal experience and state-of-the-art practices in the mental health and substance use disorder fields.
